src/fst/compounding.lexc
LEXICON PROPNMFCOMP

sivjjot+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:sivjjoh GAHPIR ; !
sivjjot+N+Sem/Hum:sivjjog GAHPIR ;
rohkki+N+Sem/Hum:rohkki AIGI ;
ránnjá+N+Sem/Hum:ránºnjá ALBMILONG ;
neahpi+N+Sem/Hum:neahºpi GOAHTI-IU ;
nebá+N+Sem/Hum:nebá ALBMILONG ;
gázzi+N+Sem/Group_Hum:gázzi GOAHTI-I ;
riehpu+N+Sem/Hum:riehºpu GOAHTI-U ;
ribon+N+Sem/Ani:ribon GAHPIR ;
riehpu+N+Sem/Hum:riehºpu GOAHTI-U ;
belá+N+Sem/Hum:belá ALBMILONG ;
lávvi+N+Sem/Hum:lávvi GOAHTI-I ;
nammasaš+A+Sem/Hum:nammas AHKASAS ;
váidni+N+Sem/Hum:vájdni GOAHTI-I ;
ránná+N+G3+Sem/Hum:ránºná ALBMILONG ;
ránni+N+G3+Sem/Hum:ránºni GOAHTI-I ;
gázzi+N+Sem/Group_Hum:gázzi GOAHTI-I ;
rávki+N+Sem/Hum:rávºki GOAHTI-I ;
guoibmi+N+Sem/Hum:guojbmi GOAHTI-IU ;
namma+N+Sem/Ani_Hum:nam DER-AGAdj  ;
joavku+N+Sem/Group_Hum_Plc:joavºku GOAHTI-U ;
oamehas+N+Sem/Hum:oamehass JOHTOLAT ;


LEXICON PROPNMALCOMP

áddjá+N+Sem/Hum:áddjá ALBMILONG ;
vieljaš+N+Sem/Hum:vieljaž GAHPIR ;
áddjut+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:áddjob GAHPIR ;
áddjut+N+Sem/Hum:áddjub GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
vilbealle+v1+N+Sem/Hum:vil#beall BEALLE ;
vilbealle+v2+N+Sem/Hum:vil#bealli GOAHTI-IU ;
vilba+N+Sem/Hum:vilºba GOAHTI-A ;
čeahci+N+Sem/Hum:čeahºci GOAHTI-IU ;
eahki+N+Sem/Hum:eahºki GOAHTI-I ;
vivva+N+Sem/Hum:vivva GOAHTI ;
máhka+N+Sem/Hum:máhºka GOAHTI ;
vilbealli+N+Sem/Dummytag:vil#beal%> Rreal ;
bárdni+N+Sem/Hum:bárdni GOAHTI-IU ;
lunta+N+Sem/Hum:lunºta GOAHTI-A ;
gánda+N+Sem/Hum:gánºda GOAHTI ;
eanu+N+Sem/Hum:eatnu BOAZU ;
vuohppa+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:vuohpp    Rreal ;
vuohppa+N+Sem/Hum:vuohppa GOAHTI ;
máttaráddjá+N+Sem/Hum:máttar#áddjá ALBMILONG ;
viellja+N+Sem/Hum:viellja GOAHTI ;
viellja+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:vieljja K ;
viellja+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:vieljja K ;
áhčči+N+Sem/Hum:áhčči ALBMI ;
áhčči+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:áhččás # ; !LIA
reaŋga+N+Sem/Hum:reaŋºga GOAHTI ;
reaŋga+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:reanºga GOAHTI ;
egá+N+Sem/Hum:egá ALBMILONG ;
fáre+N+Sem/Hum:fáre GOAHTI ;
váre+N+Sem/Hum:váre GOAHTI ;
isit+N+Sem/Hum:isid GAHPIRLONG ;
isit+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:isiđ GAHPIRLONG ;
ristáhčči+N+Sem/Hum:rist9#áhčči ALBMI ;
stuoraviellja+N+Sem/Hum:stuora#viellja GOAHTI ;
stuorraviellja+N+Sem/Hum:stuorra#viellja GOAHTI ;
áddjárohkki+N+Sem/Hum:áddjá#rohkki AIGI ;

LEXICON PROPNFEMCOMP

muoŧŧá+N+Sem/Hum:muoŧŧá ALBMILONG ;
muoŧŧá+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth-a-á:muoŧŧa K ;
nieida+N+Sem/Hum:niejºda GOAHTI ;
áhkkut+N+Sem/Hum:áhkkub GAHPIRLONGSHORT  ;
áhkku+N+Sem/Hum:áhkku ALBMILONG ;
siessá+N+Sem/Hum:siessá ALBMILONG ;
oabbá+N+Sem/Hum:oabbá ALBMILONG ;
oambealli+N+Sem/Hum:oam9#beal%> Rreal ;
oarpmealli+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmeal%> Rreal ;
oarpmealle+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:oarbmeall BEALLE ;
oarpmealle+v1+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmeall BEALLE ;
oarpmealle+v2+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmealli GOAHTI-IU ;
oarpmealle+v3+N+Sem/Hum:oarbme#beall BEALLE ;
oarpmealle+v4+N+Sem/Hum:oarbme#bealli GOAHTI-IU ;
mannji+N+Sem/Hum:mannji GOAHTI-IU ;
goaski+N+Sem/Hum:goasºki GOAHTI-IU ;
ipmi+N+Sem/Hum:ipmi ALBMI ;
sápmelaš+N+Sem/Hum:sápmelažž JOHTOLAT "Saami N" ;
sápmelaš+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:sámpelažž JOHTOLAT  ;
sápmelaš+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:sámpelážž JOHTOLAT  ;
sápmelaš+N+Sem/Hum+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:sápmelaččát K  ;
muore+N+Sem/Hum:muore GOAHTI ;
eamit+N+Sem/Hum:eamid GAHPIRLONG ;
eamit+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:eamiđ GAHPIRLONG ;
máttaráhkku+N+Sem/Hum:máttar#áhkku ALBMILONG ;
máttaráhkkut+N+Sem/Hum:máttar#áhkkub GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
oambealle+v1+N+Sem/Hum:oam9#beall BEALLE ;
oambealle+v2+N+Sem/Hum:oam9#bealli GOAHTI-IU ;
oarpmembealle+v1+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmem9#beall BEALLE ;
oarpmembealle+v2+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmem9#bealli GOAHTI-IU ;
oarpmembealle+v3+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmen#beall BEALLE ;
oarpmembealle+v4+N+Sem/Hum:oarpmen#bealli GOAHTI-IU ;
eadni+N+Sem/Hum:eadni GOAHTI-I ;
biigá+N+Sem/Hum:bijºgá ALBMILONG ;
biigá+N+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Hum:bijºga ALBMILONG ;
risteadni+N+Sem/Hum:rist9#eadni EADNI ;
stuoraoabbá+N+Sem/Hum:stuora#oabbá ALBMILONG ;
stuorraoabbá+N+Sem/Hum:stuorra#oabbá ALBMILONG ;

LEXICON UndynamicCompounds

< [%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+ %- > DigitComps ;
< [A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Á | R | S | T | V | Š | Č | Ŧ | Z | Æ | Ø | Ä | Ö ] %- > AlphaComps ;
< [%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]^4 %- > YearComps ;

LEXICON DigitComps

ruvdnosaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ruvdnos AHKASAS ;
jahkásaš+A+Sem/Hum:jahkás AHKASAS ;
ahkásaš+A+Sem/Hum:ahkás AHKASAS ;
ivdnásaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ivdnás AHKASAS ;
mehter+N+Sem/Measr:mehter GAHPIR ;
minuhtta+v1+N+Sem/Measr_Time:minuhtta GOAHTI-A ;
minuhtta+v2+N+Sem/Measr_Time:minukºta GOAHTI-A ;
diibmu+N+Sem/Measr_Obj_Time:dijbmu GOAHTI-U ;
proseanta+N+Sem/Part:proseanºta GOAHTI-A ;


LEXICON AlphaComps

čuokkis+N+Sem/Measr_Sign:čuoggis LASIS ;
linjá+v2+N+Sem/Edu_Geom:linºjá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;

LEXICON YearComps

jahki+N+Sem/Ani_Hum:jahkás DER-SAS ;
lohku+N+Sem/Amount:lohºku ALBMI ;
konvenšuvdna+N+Sem/Rule:konvenšu TELEFON ;
láhka+N+Sem/Rule:láhºka GOAHTI-A ;
